Tennessee, session 114, HB0728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1002, is amended by deleting in
subdivision (h)(1) the language "FY 2024-2025" and substituting instead the language "FY
2025-2026".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
subsection (c) the language "from July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025" and substituting instead
the language "from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
in subdivision (c)(1) the language "July 1, 2024" and substituting instead the language "July 1,
2025".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
in subdivision (c)(2) the language "July 1, 2024" and substituting instead the language "July 1,
2025".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
in subdivision (c)(3) the language "July 1, 2024" and substituting instead the language "July 1,
2025".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
subdivision (c)(4) the language "after July 1, 2024, shall pay in FY 2024-2025" and substituting
instead the language "after July 1, 2025, shall pay in FY 2025-2026".
HB0728
002474
- 1 -

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1003, is amended by deleting in
subdivision (c)(5) the language "from July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025" and substituting
instead the language "from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1010, is amended by deleting
the language "June 30, 2025" and substituting instead the language "June 30, 2026".
SECTION 9. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002474